District of Columbia statutes.
42-1761

Repealed

Effect of license revocation or suspension upon partnership, association, or corporation.

Repealed.

Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-209, § 24, 30 DCR 390
Sept. 26, 1984, D.C. Law 5-117, § 2(s), 31 DCR 4023
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1233(y), 46 DCR 3142
1981 Ed., § 45-1943.
Delegation of authority under Law 4-209, see Mayor’s Order 83-123, May 6, 1983.